District of Columbia statutes.
47-2888.05

Inspections.

(a)

A person designated by the Mayor is authorized, after presenting proper identification, to enter at reasonable times any veterinary facility for the purpose of making inspections to determine compliance with this part or other laws or regulations regarding the practice of veterinary medicine.

(b)

An inspection may include:

(1)

Examining and copying records; and

(2)

Examining operating equipment, systems, and components to determine the sanitary and safety conditions at a facility.

(c)

The Mayor may issue subpoenas to obtain records.

March 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 302(b), 61 DCR 1184
This section is referenced in § 47-2888.04.